North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 5. Temporary Custody; Nonsecure Custody; Custody Hearings.

§ 7B-500.
Taking a juvenile into temporary custody; civil and criminal immunity.

Temporary custody means the taking of physical custody and providing personal care and supervision until a court order for nonsecure custody can be obtained. A juvenile may be taken into temporary custody without a court order by a law enforcement officer or a department of social services worker if there are reasonable grounds to believe that the juvenile is abused, neglected, or dependent and that the juvenile would be injured or could not be taken into custody if it were first necessary to obtain a court order. If a department of social services worker takes a juvenile into temporary custody under this section, the worker may arrange for the placement, care, supervision, and transportation of the juvenile.

The following individuals shall, without a court order, take into temporary custody an infant under seven days of age that is voluntarily delivered to the individual by the infant’s parent who does not express an intent to return for the infant:

A health care provider, as defined under G.S. 90-21.11, who is on duty or at a hospital or at a local or district health department or at a nonprofit community health center.

A law enforcement officer who is on duty or at a police station or sheriff’s office.

A social services worker who is on duty or at a local department of social services.

A certified emergency medical service worker who is on duty or at a fire or emergency medical services station.

An individual who takes an infant into temporary custody under subsection (b) of this section shall perform any act necessary to protect the physical health and well-being of the infant and shall immediately notify the department of social services or a local law enforcement agency. Any individual who takes an infant into temporary custody under subsection (b) of this section may inquire as to the parents’ identities and as to any relevant medical history, but the parent is not required to provide the information. The individual shall notify the parent that the parent is not required to provide the information.

Any adult may, without a court order, take into temporary custody an infant under seven days of age that is voluntarily delivered to the individual by the infant’s parent who does not express an intent to return for the infant. Any individual who takes an infant into temporary custody under this section shall perform any act necessary to protect the physical health and well-being of the infant and shall immediately notify the department of social services or a local law enforcement agency. An individual who takes an infant into temporary custody under this subsection may inquire as to the parents’ identities and as to any relevant medical history, but the parent is not required to provide the information. The individual shall notify the parent that the parent is not required to provide the information.

An individual described in subsection (b) or (d) of this section is immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of any omission or action taken pursuant to the requirements of subsection (c) or (d) of this section as long as that individual was acting in good faith. The immunity established by this subsection does not extend to gross negligence, wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing that would otherwise be actionable.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1985, c. 408, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 1; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 27, s. 2; 1995, c. 391, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2001-291, s. 2; 2021-182, s. 3(a).

Cross References.

As to immunity from prosecution for child abandonment under

G.S. 14-322

and 14-322.1 for parent voluntarily delivering infant less than 7 days old as provided in this section, see

G.S. 14-322.3

.

§ 7B-501.
Duties of person taking juvenile into temporary custody.

A person who takes a juvenile into custody without a court order under

G.S. 7B-500

shall proceed as follows:

Notify the juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker that the juvenile has been taken into temporary custody and advise the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker of the right to be present with the juvenile until a determination is made as to the need for nonsecure custody. Failure to notify the parent that the juvenile is in custody shall not be grounds for release of the juvenile.

Release the juvenile to the juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker if the person having the juvenile in temporary custody decides that continued custody is unnecessary.

The person having temporary custody shall communicate with the director of the department of social services who shall consider prehearing diversion. If the decision is made to file a petition, the director shall contact the judge or person delegated authority pursuant to

G.S. 7B-502

for a determination of the need for continued custody.

A juvenile taken into temporary custody under this Article shall not be held for more than 12 hours, or for more than 24 hours if any of the 12 hours falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, unless:

A petition or motion for review has been filed by the director of the department of social services, and

An order for nonsecure custody has been entered by the court.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 335, ss. 1, 2; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 17, s. 1; c. 27, s. 3; 1995, c. 391, s. 2; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 family law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1471 (1980).

For comment, “The Child Abuse Amendments of 1984: Congress Is Calling North Carolina to Respond to the Baby Doe Dilemma,” 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 975 (1984).

§ 7B-502.
Authority to issue custody orders; delegation.

In the case of any juvenile alleged to be within the jurisdiction of the court, the court may order that the juvenile be placed in nonsecure custody pursuant to criteria set out in

G.S. 7B-503

when custody of the juvenile is necessary. The order for nonsecure custody may be entered ex parte. Unless the petition is being filed pursuant to

G.S. 7B-404

, telephonic communication that the department will be seeking nonsecure custody shall be given to counsel, or if unavailable, to a partner or employee at the attorney’s office when any of the following occur:

The department has received written notification that a respondent has counsel for the juvenile matter.

The respondent is represented by counsel in a juvenile proceeding within the same county involving another juvenile of the respondent.

Notice is not required to provisional counsel appointed pursuant to

G.S. 7B-602

.

Any district court judge shall have the authority to issue nonsecure custody orders pursuant to

G.S. 7B-503

. The chief district court judge may delegate the court’s authority to persons other than district court judges by administrative order which shall be filed in the office of the clerk of superior court. The administrative order shall specify which persons shall be contacted for approval of a nonsecure custody order pursuant to

G.S. 7B-503

.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 590, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2015-136, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-136, s. 3, effective July 2, 2015, inserted the (a) and (b) designations; added the second and third sentences in subsection (a), including subdivisions (a)(1) and (2).

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 family law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1471 (1980).

§ 7B-503.
Criteria for nonsecure custody.

When a request is made for nonsecure custody, the court shall first consider release of the juvenile to the juvenile’s parent, relative, guardian, custodian, or other responsible adult. An order for nonsecure custody shall be made only when there is a reasonable factual basis to believe the matters alleged in the petition are true, and any of the following apply:

The juvenile has been abandoned.

The juvenile has suffered physical injury, sexual abuse, or serious emotional damage as defined by

G.S. 7B-101(1)

e.

The juvenile is exposed to a substantial risk of physical injury or sexual abuse because the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker has created the conditions likely to cause injury or abuse or has failed to provide, or is unable to provide, adequate supervision or protection.

The juvenile is in need of medical treatment to cure, alleviate, or prevent suffering serious physical harm which may result in death, disfigurement, or substantial impairment of bodily functions, and the juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker is unwilling or unable to provide or consent to the medical treatment.

The parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker consents to the nonsecure custody order.

The juvenile is a runaway and consents to nonsecure custody.

A juvenile alleged to be abused, neglected, or dependent shall be placed in nonsecure custody only when there is a reasonable factual basis to believe that there are no other reasonable means available to protect the juvenile. In no case shall a juvenile alleged to be abused, neglected, or dependent be placed in secure custody.

Whenever a petition is filed under G.S. 7B-302(d1), the court shall rule on the petition prior to returning the child to a home where the alleged abuser or abusers are or have been present. If the court finds that the alleged abuser or abusers have a history of violent behavior against people, the court shall order the alleged abuser or abusers to submit to a complete mental health evaluation by a licensed psychologist or psychiatrist. The court may order the alleged abuser or abusers to pay the cost of any mental health evaluation required under this section.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 426, ss. 1-4; c. 526; 1983, c. 590, ss. 2-6; 1987, c. 101; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1090, s. 3; 1989, c. 550; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-318, s. 4; 1999-456, s. 60; 2011-295, s. 2; 2019-33, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-295, s. 2, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date, in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a), added “any of the following apply”; and in subdivisions (a)(1) through (a)(5), made a minor stylistic change.

Session Laws 2019-33, s. 6, effective October 1, 2019, rewrote subdivision (a)(2), which formerly read: “The juvenile has suffered physical injury or sexual abuse.”

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 family law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1471 (1980).

For article on rights and interest of parent, child, family and state, see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 85 (1981).

For article, “Coercive Governmental Intervention and the Family: A Comment on North Carolina’s Proposed Standards,” see 7 Campbell L. Rev. 145 (1984).

§ 7B-504.
Order for nonsecure custody.

The custody order shall be in writing and shall direct a law enforcement officer or other authorized person to take physical custody of the juvenile and to make due return on the order. A copy of the order shall be given to the juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker by the official executing the order.

An officer receiving an order for custody which is complete and regular on its face may execute it in accordance with its terms. If the court finds on the basis of the petition and request for nonsecure custody or the testimony of the petitioner that a less intrusive remedy is not available, the court may authorize a law enforcement officer to enter private property to take physical custody of the juvenile. If required by exigent circumstances of the case, the court may authorize a law enforcement officer to make a forcible entry at any hour. The officer is not required to inquire into the regularity or continued validity of the order and shall not incur criminal or civil liability for its due service.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1989, c. 124; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2015-43, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-43, s. 1, effective June 2, 2015, substituted “take physical” for “assume” in the first sentence of the first paragraph; and inserted the second and third sentences in the second paragraph. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 family law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1471 (1980).

§ 7B-505.
Placement while in nonsecure custody.

A juvenile meeting the criteria set out in

G.S. 7B-503

may be placed in nonsecure custody with the department of social services or a person designated in the order for temporary residential placement in any of the following:

A licensed foster home or a home otherwise authorized by law to provide such care.

A facility operated by the department of social services.

Any other home or facility, including the home of a parent, relative, nonrelative kin, or other person with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile, approved by the court and designated in the order.

(a1)

If juvenile siblings are removed from the home and placed in the nonsecure custody of a county department of social services, the director shall make reasonable efforts to place the juvenile siblings in the same home. The director is not required to make reasonable efforts under this subsection if the director documents that placing the juvenile siblings would be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the juvenile siblings. If, after making reasonable efforts, the director is unable to place the juvenile siblings in the same home, the director shall make reasonable efforts to provide frequent sibling visitation and ongoing interaction between the juvenile siblings, unless the director documents that frequent visitation or other ongoing interaction between the juvenile siblings would be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the juvenile siblings.

The court shall order the department of social services to make diligent efforts to notify relatives and other persons with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile that the juvenile is in nonsecure custody and of any hearings scheduled to occur pursuant to

G.S. 7B-506

, unless the court finds the notification would be contrary to the best interests of the juvenile. The department of social services shall use due diligence to identify and notify adult relatives and other persons with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile within 30 days after the initial order removing custody. The department shall file with the court information regarding attempts made to identify and notify adult relatives of the juvenile and persons with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile. In placing a juvenile in nonsecure custody under this section, the court shall first consider whether a relative of the juvenile is willing and able to provide proper care and supervision of the juvenile in a safe home. If the court finds that the relative is willing and able to provide proper care and supervision in a safe home, then the court shall order placement of the juvenile with the relative unless the court finds that placement with the relative would be contrary to the best interests of the juvenile.

If the court does not place the juvenile with a relative, the court may consider whether nonrelative kin or other persons with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile are willing and able to provide proper care and supervision of the juvenile in a safe home. The court may order the department to notify the juvenile’s State-recognized tribe of the need for nonsecure custody for the purpose of locating relatives or nonrelative kin for placement. The court may order placement of the juvenile with nonrelative kin if the court finds the placement is in the juvenile’s best interests.

(c1)

If the court does not place the juvenile with a relative, the court may consider whether an appropriate former foster parent, nonrelative kin, or other persons with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile are willing and able to provide proper care and supervision of the juvenile in a safe home. The court may order the department to notify the juvenile’s State-recognized tribe of the need for nonsecure custody for the purpose of locating relatives or nonrelative kin for placement. The court may order placement of the juvenile with nonrelative kin if the court finds the placement is in the juvenile’s best interests.

In placing a juvenile in nonsecure custody under this section, the court shall also consider whether it is in the juvenile’s best interest to remain in the juvenile’s community of residence. In placing a juvenile in nonsecure custody under this section, the court shall consider the Indian Child Welfare Act, Pub. L. No. 95-608, 25 U.S.C. §§ 1901, et seq., as amended, and the Howard M. Metzenbaum Multiethnic Placement Act of 1994, Pub. L. No. 103-382, 108 Stat. 4056, as amended, as they may apply. Placement of a juvenile with a relative outside of this State must be in accordance with the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, Article 38 of this Chapter.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1983, c. 639, ss. 1, 2; 1997-390, s. 4; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, ss. 3, 20; 1999-456, s. 60; 2002-164, s. 4.7; 2013-129, s. 13; 2015-135, s. 2.2; 2015-136, s. 4; 2017-161, s. 5; 2021-100, s. 3; 2021-132, s. 1(d).

§ 7B-505.1.
Consent for medical care for a juvenile placed in nonsecure custody of a department of social services.

Unless the court orders otherwise, when a juvenile is placed in the nonsecure custody of a county department of social services, the director may arrange for, provide, or consent to any of the following:

Routine medical and dental care or treatment, including, but not limited to, treatment for common pediatric illnesses and injuries that require prompt intervention.

Emergency medical, surgical, psychiatric, psychological, or mental health care or treatment.

Testing and evaluation in exigent circumstances.

When placing a juvenile in nonsecure custody of a county department of social services pursuant to

G.S. 7B-502

, the court may authorize the director to consent to a Child Medical Evaluation upon written findings that demonstrate the director’s compelling interest in having the juvenile evaluated prior to the hearing required by

G.S. 7B-506

.

The director shall obtain authorization from the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian to consent to all care or treatment not covered by subsection (a) or (b) of this section, except that the court may authorize the director to provide consent after a hearing at which the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the care, treatment, or evaluation requested is in the juvenile’s best interest. Care and treatment covered by this subsection includes:

Prescriptions for psychotropic medications.

Participation in clinical trials.

Immunizations when it is known that the parent has a bona fide religious objection to the standard schedule of immunizations.

Child Medical Evaluations not governed by subsection (b) of this section, comprehensive clinical assessments, or other mental health evaluations.

Surgical, medical, or dental procedures or tests that require informed consent.

Psychiatric, psychological, or mental health care or treatment that requires informed consent.

For any care or treatment provided, the director shall make reasonable efforts to promptly notify the parent, guardian, or custodian that care or treatment will be or has been provided and give the parent or guardian frequent status reports on the juvenile’s treatment and the care provided. Upon request of the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian, the director shall make available to the parent, guardian, or custodian any results or records of the aforementioned evaluations, except when prohibited by G.S. 122C-53(d). The results of a Child Medical Evaluation shall only be disclosed according to the provisions of

G.S. 7B-700

.

Except as prohibited by federal law, the department may disclose confidential information deemed necessary for the juvenile’s assessment and treatment to a health care provider serving the juvenile.

Unless the court has ordered otherwise, except as prohibited by federal law, a health care provider shall disclose confidential information about a juvenile to a director of a county department of social services with custody of the juvenile and a parent, guardian, or custodian.

History.

2015-136, s. 5; 2016-94, s. 12C.1(f1); 2017-161, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 12C.1(f1), effective July 1, 2016, in the introductory language of subsection (c), substituted “authorization” for “consent” near the beginning and substituted “to consent to” for “for” following “juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian.”

Session Laws 2017-161, s. 6, effective October 1, 2017, substituted “Consent for medical care for a juvenile” for “Juvenile” at the beginning of the section heading; and rewrote subdivision (a)(1), which read: “Routine medical and dental care or treatment.”

§ 7B-506.
Hearing to determine need for continued nonsecure custody.

No juvenile shall be held under a nonsecure custody order for more than seven calendar days without a hearing on the merits or a hearing to determine the need for continued custody. A hearing on nonsecure custody conducted under this subsection may be continued for up to 10 business days with the consent of the juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker and, if appointed, the juvenile’s guardian ad litem. In addition, the court may require the consent of additional parties or may schedule the hearing on custody despite a party’s consent to a continuance. In every case in which an order has been entered by an official exercising authority delegated pursuant to

G.S. 7B-502

, a hearing to determine the need for continued custody shall be conducted on the day of the next regularly scheduled session of district court in the city or county where the order was entered if such session precedes the expiration of the applicable time period set forth in this subsection: Provided, that if such session does not precede the expiration of the time period, the hearing may be conducted at another regularly scheduled session of district court in the district where the order was entered.

At a hearing to determine the need for continued custody, the court shall receive testimony and shall allow the parties the right to introduce evidence, to be heard in the person’s own behalf, and to examine witnesses. The petitioner shall bear the burden at every stage of the proceedings to provide clear and convincing evidence that the juvenile’s placement in custody is necessary. The court shall not be bound by the usual rules of evidence at such hearings.

The court shall be bound by criteria set forth in

G.S. 7B-503

in determining whether continued custody is warranted.

(c1)

In determining whether continued custody is warranted, the court shall consider the opinion of the mental health professional who performed an evaluation under

G.S. 7B-503

(b) before returning the juvenile to the custody of that individual.

If the court determines that the juvenile meets the criteria in

G.S. 7B-503

and should continue in custody, the court shall issue an order to that effect. The order shall be in writing with appropriate findings of fact and signed and entered within 30 days of the completion of the hearing. The findings of fact shall include the evidence relied upon in reaching the decision and purposes which continued custody is to achieve.

If the court orders at the hearing required in subsection (a) of this section that the juvenile remain in custody, a subsequent hearing on continued custody shall be held within seven business days of that hearing, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays when the courthouse is closed for transactions, and pending a hearing on the merits, hearings thereafter shall be held at intervals of no more than 30 calendar days.

Hearings conducted under subsection (e) of this section may be waived only with the consent of the juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker, and, if appointed, the juvenile’s guardian ad litem.The court may require the consent of additional parties or schedule a hearing despite a party’s consent to waiver.

In addition to the hearings required under this section, any party may schedule a hearing on the issue of placement.

(g1)

The provisions of

G.S. 7B-905.1

shall apply to determine visitation.

At each hearing to determine the need for continued custody, the court shall determine the following:

Inquire as to the identity and location of any missing parent and whether paternity is at issue. The court shall include findings as to the efforts undertaken to locate the missing parent and to serve that parent, as well as efforts undertaken to establish paternity when paternity is an issue. The order may provide for specific efforts aimed at determining the identity and location of any missing parent, as well as specific efforts aimed at establishing paternity.

Inquire about efforts made to identify and notify relatives as potential resources for placement or support and as to whether a relative of the juvenile is willing and able to provide proper care and supervision of the juvenile in a safe home. If the court finds that the relative is willing and able to provide proper care and supervision in a safe home, then the court shall order temporary placement of the juvenile with the relative unless the court finds that placement with the relative would be contrary to the best interests of the juvenile. In placing a juvenile in nonsecure custody under this section, the court shall consider the Indian Child Welfare Act, Pub. L. No. 95-608, 25 U.S.C. §§ 1901, et seq., as amended, and the Howard M. Metzenbaum Multiethnic Placement Act of 1994, Pub. L. No. 103-382, 108 Stat. 4056, as amended, as they may apply. Placement of a juvenile with a relative outside of this State must be in accordance with the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children set forth in Article 38 of this Chapter.

(2a)

If the court does not place the juvenile with a relative, the court may consider whether nonrelative kin or other persons with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile is willing and able to provide proper care and supervision of the juvenile in a safe home. The court may order the department to notify the juvenile’s State-recognized tribe of the need for nonsecure custody for the purpose of locating relatives or nonrelative kin for placement. The court may order placement of the juvenile with nonrelative kin or other persons with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile if the court finds the placement is in the juvenile’s best interests.

Inquire as to whether there are other juveniles remaining in the home from which the juvenile was removed and, if there are, inquire as to the specific findings of the assessment conducted under

G.S. 7B-302

and any actions taken or services provided by the director for the protection of the other juveniles.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 469, s. 13; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1090, s. 4; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 27, s. 1; 1997-390, ss. 5, 6; 1998-229, s. 4; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, ss. 4.1, 21; 1999-318, s. 5; 1999-456, s. 60; 2001-208, ss. 16, 24; 2001-487, s. 101; 2003-337, s. 9; 2005-55, s. 11; 2007-276, s. 1; 2013-129, s. 14; 2015-136, s. 6; 2017-161, s. 7.

§ 7B-507.
Juvenile placed in nonsecure custody of a department of social services.

An order placing or continuing the placement of a juvenile in the nonsecure custody of a county department of social services:

Shall contain a finding that the juvenile’s continuation in or return to the juvenile’s own home would be contrary to the juvenile’s health and safety.

Shall contain specific findings as to whether a county department of social services has made reasonable efforts to prevent the need for placement of the juvenile. In determining whether efforts to prevent the placement of the juvenile were reasonable, the juvenile’s health and safety shall be the paramount concern. The court may find that efforts to prevent the need for the juvenile’s placement were precluded by an immediate threat of harm to the juvenile. A finding that reasonable efforts were not made by a county department of social services shall not preclude the entry of an order authorizing the juvenile’s placement when the court finds that placement is necessary for the protection of the juvenile.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-136, s. 7, effective October 1, 2015, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

Shall specify that the juvenile’s placement and care are the responsibility of the county department of social services and that the department is to provide or arrange for the foster care or other placement of the juvenile, unless after considering the department’s recommendations, the court orders a specific placement the court finds to be in the juvenile’s best interests.

May order services or other efforts aimed at returning the juvenile to a safe home.

through (d) Repealed by Session Laws 2015-136, s. 7, effective October 1, 2015, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

History.

1998-229, ss. 4.1, 21.1; 1999-456, s. 60; 2001-487, s. 2; 2005-398, s. 1; 2011-295, s. 3; 2013-129, s. 15; 2013-378, s. 1; 2015-136, s. 7.

§ 7B-508.
Telephonic communication authorized.

All communications, notices, orders, authorizations, and requests authorized or required by

G.S. 7B-501

, 7B-503, and 7B-504 may be made by telephone when other means of communication are impractical. All written orders pursuant to telephonic communication shall bear the name and the title of the person communicating by telephone, the signature and the title of the official entering the order, and the hour and the date of the authorization.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 469, s. 13; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1090, s. 4; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 27, s. 1; 1997-390, ss. 5, 6; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, s. 4; 1999-456, s. 60.